Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1503
Acquisition; hearing; when required; procedure.

Within ten days after receipt of notice of disapproval pursuant to section 8-1502, the acquiring party may request an agency hearing on the proposed acquisition. At such hearing, all issues shall be determined on the record pursuant to the administrative rules of procedure and the rules and regulations as may be issued by the Department of Banking and Finance in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. At the conclusion of such hearing, the Director of Banking and Finance shall by order approve or disapprove the proposed acquisition on the basis of the record made at such hearing.

Laws 1983, LB 240, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 25.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.